Hawaii, session 2026, HB1892.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the board of education serves as the policy-making body for the State's public school system.  While the board of education currently includes a nonvoting student representative and a nonvoting military representative, the board does not have a formal seat for a public school teacher. The legislature further finds that teachers are the primary implementers of board of education policy and possess unique, ground-level insights into the challenges and opportunities within Hawaii's classrooms.  The legislature believes that adding a nonvoting teacher representative from bargaining unit (5) will ensure that the board has direct access to professional pedagogical expertise and first and knowledge of the impact of policy decisions on students and educators. The purpose of this Act is to add a nonvoting teacher representative, to be selected by the exclusive representative of bargaining unit(5), to the board of education. SECTION 2.  Section 302A-121, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§302A-121[]]  Board of education; members; student [and], military, and teacher representatives.  (a) The board shall consist of nine voting members as follows: (1)  One member from the county of Hawaii; (2)  One member from the county of Maui; (3)  One member from the county of Kauai; (4)  Three members from the city and county of Honolulu; and (5)  Three at-large members; provided that the governor shall select an at-large member as the chairperson. The members shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. The governor may remove or suspend for cause any member of the board. (b) Pursuant to article XVIII, section 12, of the Hawaii State Constitution, the period of transition from the elected to the appointed board shall be as determined in section 21 of Act 5, Session Laws of Hawaii 2011. (c)  The members of the board shall serve without pay but shall be entitled to reimbursement for necessary expenses, including travel and board and lodging expenses, while attending meetings of the board or when actually engaged in business relating to the work of the board. (d)  Pursuant to section 302A-447, the state student council shall select a nonvoting public high school student representative to the board. (e) Pursuant to section 302A-1101(c), the board shall invite the senior military commander in Hawaii to appoint a nonvoting military representative to the board. (f)  The exclusive representative for bargaining unit (5) shall appoint to the board a nonvoting public school teacher representative, who shall be in good standing. The term of the nonvoting public school teacher representative shall be two years; provided that the nonvoting public school teacher representative may be reappointed for one additional consecutive term of two years. (g)  The nonvoting public school teacher representative appointed pursuant to subsection (f) shall be allowed to participate in all board meetings and shall be allowed to enter into executive sessions; provided that the nonvoting public school teacher representative shall be excluded from any executive session that involves matters related to collective bargaining negotiations or other personnel matters that may pose a conflict of interest." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________